District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-3203

Exemptions.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 16, 1978, D.C. Law 2-58, § 103, 24 DCR 5765
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Aug. 12, 1998, D.C. Law 12-142, § 3(i), 45 DCR 4826

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-3203.
1973 Ed., § 47-3103.